Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1010.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration - legislative intent.
(1) The general assembly finds and declares that:
(a) Reductions or changes in federal health-care funding
associated with the federal budget bill, H.R. 1 of the 119th Congress
(2025-2026), Pub.L. 119-21, including the bill's ban on spending
medicaid dollars on services provided by essential community providers,
have the potential to disproportionately harm disproportionately impacted
communities;
(b) These impacts may result in loss of coverage, reduced access
to care, worsened health outcomes, and a strain on community health
systems; and
(c) The state of Colorado must safeguard disproportionately
impacted communities.
(2) It is the intent of the general assembly that the department of
public health and environment and the department of health care policy
and financing carry out the requirements of this act through the use of
existing resources.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25-1-139 as
follows:
25-1-139. Continuity of care advisory guidance - repeal.
(1) BY DECEMBER 15, 2025, THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND
ENVIRONMENT, CREATED IN SECTION 25-1-102, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF
-2- HB25B-1010

HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING, CREATED IN SECTION 25.5-1-104,
SHALL JOINTLY ISSUE ADVISORY GUIDANCE TO HEALTH-CARE PROVIDERS
AND HEALTH-CARE FACILITIES PROHIBITED FROM RECEIVING FEDERAL
MEDICAID FINANCING PURSUANT TO THE FEDERAL BUDGET BILL, H.R. 1 OF
THE 119TH CONGRESS (2025-2026), PUB.L. 119-21, ON HOW THE
PROVIDERS AND FACILITIES CAN PRIORITIZE THE CONTINUITY OF CARE FOR
DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED COMMUNITIES, WITH AN EMPHASIS ON
RURAL AREAS, COMMUNITIES OF COLOR, AND LOW-INCOME POPULATIONS.
THE ADVISORY GUIDANCE MUST INCLUDE STRATEGIES, WITHIN THE
PROVIDER'S SCOPE OF PRACTICE, FOR MAINTAINING ACCESS TO
IMMUNIZATIONS, CANCER SCREENINGS, AND FAMILY PLANNING SERVICES
FOR THESE COMMUNITIES. A HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER OR HEALTH-CARE
FACILITY DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1) IS ENCOURAGED TO FOLLOW
THE ADVISORY GUIDANCE PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENTS.
(2) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-3- HB25B-1010